Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2243
Long-term care facility, defined.

Long-term care facility includes:

(1) A nursing facility;

(2) An assisted-living facility;

(3) Any other adult care home;

(4) A continuing care community;

(5) Any swing bed in an acute care facility or extended care facility; and

(6) Any adult day service.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 608, § 26;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 157;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 6.